District of Columbia statutes.
21-587

Veterans’ Administration and military hospital facilities.

This chapter does not require the admission of a person to a Veterans’ Administration or military hospital facility unless the person is otherwise eligible for care and treatment in the facility.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-587.
1973 Ed., § 21-587.